Missouri, session 2026, HB3103.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 191.765, 191.769, 191.775, and 191.776, RSMo, are repealed
and four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 191.765, 191.769,
191.775, and 191.776, to read as follows:
191.765. As used in sections 191.765 to [191.773] 191.777 and section 290.145, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Bar" or "tavern", any licensed establishment which serves liquor on the premises
for which not more than ten percent of the gross sales receipts of the business are supplied by
food purchases, either for consumption on the premises or elsewhere;
(2) "Other person in charge", the agent of the proprietor authorized to give
administrative directions to and general supervision of the activities within the public place,
work place or public meeting at any given time;
(3) "Proprietor", the party who ultimately controls, governs or directs the activities
within the public place, work place or public meeting, regardless of whether he or she is the
owner or lessor of such place or site. The term does not mean the owner of the property
unless he or she ultimately controls, governs or directs the activities within the public place
or public meeting. The term "proprietor" shall apply to a corporation as well as an individual;
(4) "Public meeting", a gathering in person of members of a governmental body,
whether an open or closed session, as defined in chapter 610;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3103 2
(5) "Public place", any enclosed indoor area used by the general public or serving as a
place of work including, but not limited to:
(a) Any retail or commercial establishments;
(b) Health care facilities, health clinics or ambulatory care facilities including, but not
limited to, laboratories associated with health care treatment, hospitals, nursing homes,
physicians' offices and dentists' offices;
(c) Any vehicle used for public transportation including, but not limited to, buses,
taxicabs and limousines for hire;
(d) Rest rooms;
(e) Elevators;
(f) Libraries, educational facilities, day care facilities, museums, auditoriums and art
galleries;
(g) All public areas and waiting rooms of public transportation facilities including,
but not limited to, bus and airport facilities;
(h) Any enclosed indoor place used for entertainment or recreation including, but not
limited to, gymnasiums, theater lobbies, concert halls, arenas and swimming pools;
(i) Any other enclosed indoor areas used by the general public including, but not
limited to, corridors and shopping malls;
(6) "Restaurant", any building, structure or area used, maintained or advertised as or
held out to the public to be an enclosure where meals for consideration of payment are made
available to be consumed on the premises;
(7) "Smoking"[,]:
(a) Possession of burning tobacco in the form of a cigarette, cigar, pipe or other
smoking equipment; or
(b) Use of a vapor product;
(8) "Vapor product", the same meaning given to the term in section 407.925.
191.769. The following areas are not considered a public place:
(1) An entire room or hall which is used for private social functions, provided that the
seating arrangements are under the control of the sponsor of the function and not of the
proprietor or other person in charge;
(2) Limousines for hire and taxicabs, where the driver and all passengers agree to
smoking in such vehicle;
(3) Performers on the stage, provided that the smoking is part of the production;
(4) A place where more than fifty percent of the volume of trade or business carried
on is that of the blending of tobaccos or sale of tobaccos, cigarettes, pipes, cigars, vapor
products, or smoking sundries;

HB 3103 3
(5) Bars, taverns, restaurants that seat less than fifty people, bowling alleys and
billiard parlors, which conspicuously post signs stating that "Nonsmoking Areas are
Unavailable"; and
(6) [Private residences; and
(7)] Any enclosed indoor arena, stadium or other facility which may be used for
sporting events and which has a seating capacity of more than fifteen thousand persons.
191.775. No person shall smoke or otherwise use tobacco, tobacco products, or vapor
products[, as such term is defined in section 407.925,] in any indoor area of a public
elementary or secondary school building or educational facility, excluding institutions of
higher education, or on buses used solely to transport students to or from school or to
transport students to or from any place for educational purposes. Any school board of any
school district may set policy on the permissible uses of tobacco products or vapor products in
any other nonclassroom or nonstudent occupant facility, and on the school grounds or outdoor
facility areas as the school board deems proper.
191.776. No person shall smoke or otherwise use tobacco products or vapor
products in any area of a child care facility licensed by the department of health and senior
services pursuant to the provisions of sections 210.201 to 210.245 during the period of time
when the children cared for under that license are present. Any person who violates the
provisions of this section shall be guilty of an infraction.
✔